South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S1167.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the Department of Labor, Licensing and Regulation - Board of Accountancy, relating to Board of Accountancy, designated as Regulation Document Number 5420, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. The South Carolina Board of Accountancy proposes to amend Chapter 1 of the Code of Regulations to conform to changes to the Code following the passage of Act 34 of the 2025 legislative session (S.176) and to incorporate any other changes necessary following the Board's review of its regulations. The Notice of Drafting was published in the State Register on June 27, 2025. ----XX----